Utah statutes.
75-5a-113.   Care of custodial property.
(1)  A custodian shall:
(a)  take control of custodial property;
(b)  register or record title to custodial property if appropriate; and
(c)  collect, hold, manage, invest, and reinvest custodial property.
(2)  In dealing with custodial property, a custodian shall observe the
standard of care that would be observed by a prudent person dealing with
property of another and is not limited by any other statute restricting
investments by fiduciaries.  If a custodian has a special skill or expertise
or is named custodian on the basis of representations of a special skill or
expertise, the custodian shall use the skill or expertise.  However, a
custodian may, in his discretion and without liability to the minor or the
minor's estate, retain any custodial property received from a transferor.
(3)  A custodian may invest in or pay premiums on life insurance or endowment
policies on:
(a)  the life of the minor only if the minor or the minor's estate is the sole
beneficiary; or
(b)  the life of another person in whom the minor has an insurable interest
only to the extent the minor, the minor's estate, or the custodian in the
capacity of custodian, is the irrevocable beneficiary.
(4) (a)  A custodian shall at all times keep custodial property separate and
distinct from all other property in a manner sufficient to identify it clearly
as custodial property of the minor.
(b)  Custodial property consisting of an undivided interest is so identified
if the minor's interest is held as a tenant in common and is fixed.  Custodial
property subject to recordation is so identified if it is recorded, and
custodial property subject to registration is so identified if it is either
registered, or held in an account designated, in the name of the custodian,
followed in substance by the words: "as a custodian for ...............  (name
of minor) under the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act."
(5)  A custodian shall keep records of all transactions with respect to
custodial property, including information necessary for the preparation of the
minor's tax returns, and shall make them available for inspection at
reasonable intervals by a parent or legal representative of the minor or by
the minor if the minor is 14 years of age or older.
